Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,154
Housing agency official; improper use of information.

No housing agency official shall use any information not generally available to the public which he or she acquires in the course of his or her public service for the purpose of securing financial gain for such official or others.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 83.